Nebraska, session 109, LB76.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB76 LB76
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 81-2026, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2026 (1)(a) Any officer qualified for an annuity as provided in
section 81-2025 for reasons other than disability shall be entitled to
receive a monthly annuity for the remainder of the officer's life. The
annuity payments shall continue until the end of the calendar month in
which the officer dies. The amount of the annuity shall be a percentage
of the officer's final average monthly compensation. For retirement on or
after the fifty-fifth birthday of the member or on or after the fiftieth
birthday of a member who has been in the employ of the state for twenty-
five years, as calculated in section 81-2033, the percentage shall be
three percent multiplied by the number of years of creditable service, as
calculated in section 81-2033, except that the percentage shall never be
greater than seventy-five percent.
(b) For retirement pursuant to subsection (2) of section 81-2025 on
or after the fiftieth birthday of the member but prior to the fifty-fifth
birthday of the member who has been in the employ of the state for less
than twenty-five years, as calculated in section 81-2033, the annuity
which would apply if the member were age fifty-five at the date of
retirement shall be reduced by five-ninths of one percent for each month
by which the early retirement date precedes age fifty-five or for each
month by which the early retirement date precedes the date upon which the
member has served for twenty-five years, whichever is earlier. Any
officer who has completed thirty years of creditable service with the
Nebraska State Patrol shall have retirement benefits computed as if the
officer had reached age fifty-five.
(c) For purposes of this computation:
(i) For an officer who became a member prior to July 1, 2016, final
average monthly compensation means the sum of the officer's total
compensation during the three twelve-month periods of service as an
officer in which compensation was the greatest divided by thirty-six and:
-2-

LB76 LB76
2025 2025
(A) For any officer employed on or before January 4, 1979, the
officer's total compensation includes payments received for unused
vacation and sick leave accumulated during the final three years of
service; or
(B) For any officer employed after January 4, 1979, and prior to
July 1, 2016, the officer's total compensation includes payments received
for unused holiday compensatory time and unused compensatory time; and
(ii) For an officer who became a member on or after July 1, 2016,
final average monthly compensation means the sum of the officer's total
compensation during the five twelve-month periods of service as an
officer in which compensation was the greatest divided by sixty and does
not include payments received for unused sick leave, unused vacation
leave, unused holiday compensatory time, unused compensatory time, or any
other type of unused leave, compensatory time, or similar benefits,
converted to cash payments. The five twelve-month periods used for
calculating an officer's final average monthly compensation ends with the
month during which the officer's final compensation is paid. In the
determination of compensation, that part of an officer's compensation for
the plan year which exceeds the officer's compensation for the preceding
plan year by more than eight percent during the capping period shall be
excluded. Such officer's compensation for the first plan year of the
capping period shall be compared to the officer's compensation received
for the plan year immediately preceding the capping period. For purposes
of this subdivision, capping period means the five plan years preceding
the officer's retirement date. The board may adopt and promulgate rules
and regulations for the implementation of this section, including rules
and regulations related to prorating, annualizing, or recalculating an
officer's final average monthly compensation for each plan year in the
capping period.
(2) Any officer qualified for an annuity as provided in section
81-2025 for reasons of disability shall be entitled to receive a monthly
-3-

LB76 LB76
2025 2025
annuity for the remainder of the period of disablement as provided in
sections 81-2028 to 81-2030. The amount of the annuity shall be fifty
percent of the officer's monthly compensation at the date of disablement
if the officer has completed seventeen or fewer years of creditable
service. If the officer has completed more than seventeen years of
creditable service, the amount of the annuity shall be three percent of
the final monthly compensation at the date of disablement multiplied by
the total years of creditable service but not to exceed seventy-five
percent of the final average monthly compensation as defined in
subsection (1) of this section. The date of disablement shall be the date
on which the benefits as provided in section 81-2028 have been exhausted.
(3) Upon the death of an officer after retirement for reasons other
than disability, benefits shall be provided as a percentage of the amount
of the officer's annuity, calculated as follows:
(a) If there is a surviving spouse but no dependent child or
children of the officer under nineteen years of age, the surviving spouse
shall receive a benefit equal to one hundred seventy-five percent of the
amount of the officer's annuity for the remainder of the surviving
spouse's life;
(b) If there is a surviving spouse and the surviving spouse has in
his or her care a dependent child or children of the officer under
nineteen years of age and there is no other dependent child or children
of the officer not in the care of the surviving spouse under nineteen
years of age, the benefit shall be equal to one hundred percent of the
officer's annuity. When there is no remaining dependent child of the
officer under nineteen years of age, the benefit shall be one hundred
seventy-five percent of the amount of the officer's annuity to the
surviving spouse for the remainder of the surviving spouse's life;
(c) If there is a surviving spouse and the surviving spouse has in
his or her care a dependent child or children of the officer under
nineteen years of age or there is another dependent child or children of
-4-

LB76 LB76
2025 2025
the officer under nineteen years of age not in the care of the surviving
spouse, the benefit shall be twenty-five percent of the amount of the
officer's annuity to the surviving spouse and seventy-five percent of the
amount of the officer's annuity to the dependent children of the officer
under nineteen years of age to be divided equally among such dependent
children but in no case shall the benefit received by a surviving spouse
and dependent children residing with such spouse be less than fifty
percent of the amount of the officer's annuity. At such time as any
dependent child of the officer attains nineteen years of age, the benefit
shall be divided equally among the remaining dependent children of the
officer who have not yet attained nineteen years of age. When there is no
remaining dependent child of the officer under nineteen years of age, the
benefit shall be one hundred seventy-five percent of the amount of the
officer's annuity to the surviving spouse for the remainder of the
surviving spouse's life;
(d) If there is no surviving spouse and a dependent child or
children of the officer under nineteen years of age, the benefit shall be
equal to one hundred seventy-five percent of the officer's annuity to the
dependent children of the officer under nineteen years of age to be
divided equally among such dependent children. At such time as any
dependent child of the officer attains nineteen years of age, the benefit
shall be divided equally among the remaining dependent children of the
officer who have not yet attained nineteen years of age; and
(e) If there is no surviving spouse or no dependent child or
children of the officer under nineteen years of age, the amount of
benefit such officer has received under the Nebraska State Patrol
Retirement Act shall be computed. If such amount is less than the
contributions to the State Patrol Retirement Fund made by such officer,
plus regular interest, the difference shall be paid to the officer's
designated beneficiary or estate.
(4) Upon the death of an officer after retirement for reasons of
-5-

LB76 LB76
2025 2025
disability, benefits shall be provided as if the officer had retired for
reasons other than disability.
(5) Upon the death of an officer before retirement, benefits shall
be provided as if the officer had retired for reasons of disability on
the date of such officer's death, calculated as follows:
(a) If there is a surviving spouse but no dependent child or
children of the officer under nineteen years of age, the surviving spouse
shall receive a benefit equal to one hundred seventy-five percent of the
amount of the officer's annuity for the remainder of the surviving
spouse's life;
(b) If there is a surviving spouse and the surviving spouse has in
his or her care a dependent child or children of the officer under
nineteen years of age and there is no other dependent child or children
of the officer not in the care of the surviving spouse under nineteen
years of age, the benefit shall be equal to one hundred percent of the
officer's annuity. When there is no remaining dependent child of the
officer under nineteen years of age, the benefit shall be one hundred
seventy-five percent of the amount of the officer's annuity to the
surviving spouse for the remainder of the surviving spouse's life;
(c) If there is a surviving spouse and the surviving spouse has in
his or her care a dependent child or children of the officer under
nineteen years of age or there is another dependent child or children of
the officer under nineteen years of age not in the care of the surviving
spouse, the benefit shall be twenty-five percent of the amount of the
officer's annuity to the surviving spouse and seventy-five percent of the
amount of the officer's annuity to the dependent children of the officer
under nineteen years of age to be divided equally among such dependent
children but in no case shall the benefit received by a surviving spouse
and dependent children residing with such spouse be less than fifty
percent of the amount of the officer's annuity. At such time as any
dependent child of the officer attains nineteen years of age, the benefit
-6-

LB76 LB76
2025 2025
shall be divided equally among the remaining dependent children of the
officer who have not yet attained nineteen years of age. When there is no
remaining dependent child of the officer under nineteen years of age, the
benefit shall be one hundred seventy-five percent of the amount of the
officer's annuity to the surviving spouse for the remainder of the
surviving spouse's life;
(d) If there is no surviving spouse and a dependent child or
children of the officer under nineteen years of age, the benefit shall be
equal to one hundred seventy-five percent of the officer's annuity to the
dependent children of the officer under nineteen years of age to be
divided equally among such dependent children. At such time as any
dependent child of the officer attains nineteen years of age, the benefit
shall be divided equally among the remaining dependent children of the
officer who have not yet attained nineteen years of age; and
(e) If no benefits are paid to a surviving spouse or dependent child
or children of the officer, benefits will be paid as described in
subsection (1) of section 81-2031.
(6) A lump-sum death benefit paid to the member's beneficiary, other
than the member's estate, that is an eligible distribution may be
distributed in the form of a direct transfer to a retirement plan
eligible to receive such transfer under the provisions of the Internal
Revenue Code.
(7) For any member whose death occurs on or after January 1, 2007,
while performing qualified military service as defined in section 414(u)
of the Internal Revenue Code, the member's beneficiary shall be entitled
to any additional death benefit that would have been provided, other than
the accrual of any benefit relating to the period of qualified military
service. The additional death benefit shall be determined as if the
member had returned to employment with the Nebraska State Patrol and such
employment had terminated on the date of the member's death.
(8) Any changes made to this section by Laws 2004, LB 1097, shall
-7-

LB76 LB76
2025 2025
apply only to retirements, disabilities, and deaths occurring on or after
July 16, 2004.
Sec. 2. Section 81-2027.08, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2027.08 (1) Beginning July 1, 2011, and each July 1 thereafter,
the board shall determine the number of retired members or beneficiaries
described in subdivision (4)(b) of this section in the retirement system
and an annual benefit adjustment shall be made by the board for each
retired member or beneficiary under one of the cost-of-living adjustment
calculation methods found in subsection (2), (3), or (4) of this section.
Each retired member or beneficiary, if eligible, shall receive an annual
benefit adjustment under the cost-of-living adjustment calculation method
that provides the retired member or beneficiary the greatest annual
benefit adjustment increase. No retired member or beneficiary shall
receive an annual benefit adjustment under more than one of the cost-of-
living adjustment calculation methods provided in this section.
(2) The current benefit paid to a retired member or beneficiary
under this subsection shall be adjusted so that the purchasing power of
the benefit being paid is not less than sixty percent of the purchasing
power of the initial benefit. The purchasing power of the initial benefit
in any year following the year in which the initial benefit commenced
shall be calculated by dividing the United States Department of Labor,
Bureau of Labor Statistics, Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners
and Clerical Workers factor on June 30 of the current year by the
Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers factor
on June 30 of the year in which the benefit commenced. The result shall
be multiplied by the product that results when the amount of the initial
benefit is multiplied by sixty percent. In any year in which applying the
adjustment provided in subsection (3) of this section results in a
benefit which would be less than sixty percent of the purchasing power of
the initial benefit as calculated in this subsection, the adjustment
-8-

LB76 LB76
2025 2025
shall instead be equal to the percentage change in the Consumer Price
Index for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers factor from the prior
year to the current year.
(3) The current benefit paid to a retired member or beneficiary
under this subsection shall be increased annually by the lesser of:
(a) The the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for Urban
Wage Earners and Clerical Workers for the period between June 30 of the
prior year to June 30 of the present year; or
(b)(i) Prior to July 1, 2025, (b) two and one-half percent; and .
(ii) Beginning July 1, 2025, four percent.
(4)(a) The current benefit paid to a retired member or beneficiary
under this subsection shall be calculated by multiplying the retired
member's or beneficiary's total monthly benefit by the lesser of (i) the
cumulative change in the Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners and
Clerical Workers from the last adjustment of the total monthly benefit of
each retired member or beneficiary through June 30 of the year for which
the annual benefit adjustment is being calculated or (ii) an amount equal
to three percent per annum compounded for the period from the last
adjustment of the total monthly benefit of each retired member or
beneficiary through June 30 of the year for which the annual benefit
adjustment is being calculated.
(b) In order for a retired member or beneficiary to receive the
cost-of-living adjustment calculation method in this subsection, the
retired member or beneficiary shall be (i) a retired member or
beneficiary who has been receiving a retirement benefit for at least five
years if the member had at least twenty-five years of creditable service,
(ii) a member who has been receiving a disability retirement benefit for
at least five years pursuant to section 81-2025, or (iii) a beneficiary
who has been receiving a death benefit pursuant to section 81-2026 for at
least five years, if the member's or beneficiary's monthly accrual rate
is less than or equal to the minimum accrual rate as determined by this
-9-

LB76 LB76
2025 2025
subsection.
(c) The monthly accrual rate under this subsection is the retired
member's or beneficiary's total monthly benefit divided by the number of
years of creditable service earned by the retired or deceased member.
(d) The total monthly benefit under this subsection is the total
benefit received by a retired member or beneficiary pursuant to the
Nebraska State Patrol Retirement Act and previous adjustments made
pursuant to this section or any other provision of the act that grants a
benefit or cost-of-living increase, but the total monthly benefit shall
not include sums received by an eligible retired member or eligible
beneficiary from federal sources.
(e) Beginning July 1, 2010, the minimum accrual rate under this
subsection was forty dollars and sixteen cents. Beginning July 1, 2011,
the minimum accrual rate under this subsection was forty-one dollars and
seventy-nine cents. Beginning July 1, 2012, the minimum accrual rate
under this subsection was forty-two dollars and forty-five cents.
Beginning July 1, 2013, the board shall annually adjust the minimum
accrual rate to reflect the cumulative percentage change in the Consumer
Price Index for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers from the last
adjustment of the minimum accrual rate.
(5) Beginning July 1, 2011, and each July 1 thereafter, each retired
member or beneficiary shall receive the sum of the annual benefit
adjustment and such retiree's total monthly benefit less withholding,
which sum shall be the retired member's or beneficiary's adjusted total
monthly benefit. Each retired member or beneficiary shall receive the
adjusted total monthly benefit until the expiration of the annuity option
selected by the member or until the retired member or beneficiary again
qualifies for the annual benefit adjustment, whichever occurs first.
(6) The annual benefit adjustment pursuant to this section shall not
cause a current benefit to be reduced, and a retired member or
beneficiary shall never receive less than the adjusted total monthly
-10-

LB76 LB76
2025 2025
benefit until the annuity option selected by the member expires.
(7) The board shall adjust the annual benefit adjustment provided in
this section so that the cost-of-living adjustment provided to the
retired member or beneficiary at the time of the annual benefit
adjustment does not exceed the change in the Consumer Price Index for
Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers for the period between June 30 of
the prior year to June 30 of the present year. If the consumer price
index used in this section is discontinued or replaced, a substitute
index published by the United States Department of Labor shall be
selected by the board which shall be a reasonable representative
measurement of the cost-of-living for retired employees.
(8) This section applies to an officer who became a member prior to
July 1, 2016.
Sec. 3. Section 81-2027.09, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2027.09 On July 1 of each year, for officers who became members
on or after July 1, 2016:
(1) The board shall determine the number of retired members or
beneficiaries of members in the retirement system who became members on
or after July 1, 2016, and an annual benefit adjustment shall be made by
the board for each such retired member or beneficiary. The benefit paid
to a retired member or beneficiary under this section shall be increased
annually by the lesser of:
(a) The the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for Urban
Wage Earners and Clerical Workers for the period between June 30 of the
prior year to June 30 of the present year; or
(b)(i) Prior to July 1, 2025, (b) one percent; and .
(ii) Beginning July 1, 2025, four percent.
(2) If the consumer price index used in this section is discontinued
or replaced, a substitute index published by the United States Department
of Labor shall be selected by the board which shall be a reasonable
-11-

LB76 LB76
2025 2025
representative measurement of the cost-of-living for retired employees;
(3) (2) Each retired member or beneficiary shall receive the sum of
the annual benefit adjustment and such retired member's or beneficiary's
total monthly benefit less withholding, which sum shall be the retired
member's or beneficiary's adjusted total monthly benefit. Each such
retired member or beneficiary shall receive the adjusted total monthly
benefit until the expiration of the annuity option selected by the member
or until the retired member or beneficiary again qualifies for the annual
benefit adjustment, whichever occurs first; and
(4) (3) The annual benefit adjustment pursuant to this section shall
not cause a current benefit to be reduced, and a retired member or
beneficiary shall never receive less than the adjusted total monthly
benefit until the annuity option selected by the member expires.
Sec. 4. Original sections 81-2026, 81-2027.08, and 81-2027.09,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 5. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-12-